Idaho, session 2026, H0567.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 42-232, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 3. That Section 42-1704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 42-1776, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 42-3307, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 42-3308, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 42-3309, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 8. That Section 42-3310, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. That Section 42-3311, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 10. That Section 42-3312, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 11. That Section 42-3319, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 12. That Section 42-3320, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 13. That Section 42-3321, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 14. That Section 42-3322, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 15. That Section 42-3323, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 16. That Section 42-3324, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 17. That Section 42-3505, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 18. That Section 42-3506, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 19. That Section 42-3507, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 20. That Section 42-3508, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 21. That Section 42-3509, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 22. That Section 42-3510, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 23. That Section 42-3511, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 24. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.